Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Chapter 6. Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program.
§ 63.2-609.
VIEW exemptions.

The following TANF recipients shall be exempt from mandatory participation in VIEW and shall remain eligible for TANF financial assistance:

Any individual, including all minor caretakers, under 16 years of age;

Any individual at least 16, but no more than 19 years of age, who is enrolled full time in elementary or secondary school, including career and technical education programs. The career and technical education program must be equivalent to secondary school. Whenever feasible, such recipients should participate in summer work;

To the extent authorized by federal law and regulations, any individual who is enrolled full time in an accredited public institution of higher education or other postsecondary school licensed or certified by the Board of Education or the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia and is taking courses as part of a curriculum that leads to a postsecondary credential, such as a degree or an industry-recognized credential, certification, or license;

Any individual who is unable to participate because of a temporary medical condition that is preventing employment or training, as determined by a physician or other qualified medical professional and certified by a written medical statement. Such an exemption shall be reevaluated every 60 days to determine whether the person is still exempt;

Any individual who is disabled, as determined by receipt of Social Security Disability Benefits or Supplemental Security Income;

Any individual 60 years of age or older;

Any individual who is the sole caregiver of another member of the household who is disabled as determined by receipt of Social Security Disability Benefits or Supplemental Security Income or who is incapacitated by another condition as determined by the Board and whose presence is essential for the care of the other member on a substantially continuous basis; or

A parent or caretaker-relative of a child under 12 months of age who personally provides care for the child. A parent or caretaker-relative exempt from mandatory participation in VIEW pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt for a period of no more than 12 months. Months during which a parent or caretaker-relative is exempt may be consecutive or nonconsecutive.

In a TANF-UP case, both parents shall be referred for participation unless one meets an exemption; only one parent can be exempt. If both parents meet an exemption criterion, they shall decide who will be referred for participation.

History.

1994, cc. 858, 951, §§ 63.1-133.43, 63.1-133.48; 1995, c. 450; 2001, c. 483; 2002, cc. 81, 747; 2007, c. 568; 2011, c. 426; 2020, c. 550; 2022, c. 298.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 81 amended § 63.1-133.43, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2002, c. 81 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2002 amendment by c. 81 added “or by a registered nurse who is the physician’s designee or licensed nurse practitioner” at the end of subdivision 8.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 568 deleted the former next-to-last sentence in subdivision 2, which read: “Once the individual loses this exemption, he cannot requalify for the exemption, even if he returns to school, unless the case is closed and reopened or he becomes exempt for another reason”; in subdivision 3, in the first sentence, deleted “entry into” preceding “employment” and inserted “or other qualified medical professional”; in subdivision 4, substituted “disabled” for “incapacitated” in the first sentence and deleted the last sentence, which formerly read: “This exemption shall not be granted to either parent in a TANF-UP case; eligibility shall be evaluated for regular TANF cases on the basis of the parent’s incapacity”; in subdivision 6, substituted “disabled” for “incapacitated” and inserted “who is incapacitated by”; substituted “12 months” for “eighteen months” in the first sentence of subdivision 7; and deleted subdivisions 8 through 10, concerning pregnant women, children receiving Title IV-E Foster Care and persons standing in loco parentis.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 426 made minor stylistic changes in subdivisions 1, 2, 3, and 5; and added the second and third sentences in subdivision 7.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 550 deleted “A parent of a child not considered part of the TANF public assistance unit under §

63.2-604

may be granted a temporary exemption of not more than six weeks after the birth of such child” in subdivision 7 at the end.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 298, added subdivision 3; redesignated former subdivision 3 as subdivision 4 and redesignated accordingly; and made stylistic changes.

§ 63.2-610.
Participation in VIEW; coordinated services.

In administering VIEW, the Department shall ensure that local departments provide delivery and coordination of all services through intensive case management. VIEW participants shall be referred to a case manager. The case manager shall fully explain VIEW to the participant and shall provide the participant with written materials explaining VIEW.

The Department shall assist local departments in improving the delivery of services, including intensive case management, through the utilization of public, private and nonprofit organizations, to the extent permissible under federal law.

The Department shall be responsible for the coordination of the intensive case management. Job finding and job matching leading to independent employment shall be facilitated by the Virginia Employment Commission and the Department of Small Business and Supplier Diversity.

The Secretary of Health and Human Resources, assisted by the Secretary of Commerce and Trade, shall prepare and maintain an annual plan for coordinating and integrating all appropriate services in order to promote successful outcomes. The plan shall encourage the use of local and regional service providers and permit a variety of methods of providing services. Emphasis shall be placed on coordinating and integrating career counseling, job development, job training and skills, job placement, and academic and technical education. Public and private institutions of higher education and other agencies which offer similar or related services shall be invited to participate as fully as possible in developing, implementing and updating the annual coordination plan.

The Secretary of Health and Human Resources shall:

Increase public awareness of the federal earned income credit and encourage families who may be eligible to apply for this tax credit;

Pursue aggressive child-support initiatives as established by the General Assembly;

Work with community providers to develop adoption, education, family planning, marriage, parenting, and training options for Program participants;

Increase public awareness of the tax advantages of relocating one’s residence in order to secure employment;

Provide leadership for the development of community work experience opportunities in VIEW;

Develop strategies to educate, assist and stimulate employers to hire participants and to provide community work experience opportunities, in consultation with representatives of employers and relevant public and private agencies on the state and local level; and

Provide technical assistance to local departments to assist them in working with employers in the community to develop job and community work experience opportunities for participants.

History.

1994, cc. 858, 951, § 63.1-133.45; 1995, c. 450; 1996, cc. 589, 599; 1999, cc. 840, 855; 2002, c. 747; 2013, c. 482.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 482, effective January 1, 2014, substituted “Small Business and Supplier Diversity” for “Business Assistance” at the end of subsection C.

§ 63.2-611.
Case management; support services; transitional support services.

The Commissioner, through the local departments, with such funds as appropriated, shall offer families participating in VIEW intensive case management services throughout the family’s participation in VIEW. Case management services shall include initial assessment of the full range of services that will be needed by each family including testing and evaluation, development of the individualized agreement of personal responsibility, and periodic reassessment of service needs and the agreement of personal responsibility. It shall be the goal of the Department to have a statewide intensive case management ratio not higher than the statewide average ratio in Title IV-F of the Social Security Act Job Opportunities and Basic Skills Training Program State Plan as the ratio existed on July 1, 1995.

Local departments are authorized to provide services to VIEW families throughout the family’s participation in VIEW subject to regulations adopted by the Board, including:

Child care for the children of participants if:

The participant is employed and child-care services are required to enable the continued employment of the participant;

Child-care services are required to enable a participant to receive job placement, job training or education services; or

The participant is otherwise eligible for child care pursuant to Board regulations.

A participant whose TANF financial assistance is terminated, either voluntarily or involuntarily, shall receive the following services for up to 12 months after termination, if needed:

Assistance with child care if such assistance enables the individual to work or the individual is enrolled in an accredited public institution of higher education or other postsecondary school licensed or certified by the Board of Education or the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia and is taking courses as part of a curriculum that leads to a postsecondary credential, such as a degree or an industry-recognized credential, certification, or license;

Assistance with transportation, if such transportation enables the individual to work;

Medical assistance, including transitional medical assistance for families with a working parent who becomes ineligible for TANF financial assistance because of increased earnings according to policies of the Virginia Department of Medical Assistance Services; and

Financial assistance of $50 per month, if the participant is employed and is working at least 30 hours per week or more at the time of TANF closure and remains employed and continues to work at least 30 hours per week or more.

The Department or local departments may purchase or otherwise acquire motor vehicles from the centralized fleet of motor vehicles controlled by the Commissioner of Highways under Article 7 (§

2.2-1173

et seq.) of Chapter 11 of Title 2.2 and sell or otherwise transfer such vehicles to TANF recipients or former recipients. Purchases, sales, and other transfers of vehicles under this subsection shall not be subject to the provisions of the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.), or the provisions of §§

2.2-1124

,

2.2-1153

,

2.2-1156

, and

2.2-1177

relating to the sale, purchase, and transfer of surplus motor vehicles and other surplus state property.

Nothing in this section shall be construed or interpreted to create a cause of action or administrative claim based upon a right or entitlement to any specific services or an exemption or waiver from any provision of VIEW.

2.

Transportation that will enable parental employment or participation in services required by the agreement of personal responsibility.

3.

Job counseling, education and training, and job search assistance consistent with the purposes of VIEW.

4.

Medical assistance.

History.

1994, cc. 858, 951, § 63.1-133.46; 1995, c. 450; 1999, c. 910; 2002, c. 747; 2007, c. 568; 2019, cc. 166, 218.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 36 and 152, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Code Commission shall carry out such editorial changes to the Code of Virginia as may be required to reflect the provisions of this act changing the title ‘Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner’ to ‘Commissioner of Highways.”’ “Commissioner of Highways” was substituted for “Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner” in this section.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 350 F, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “A participant whose Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) financial assistance is terminated due to the receipt of 24 months of assistance as specified in §

63.2-612

, Code of Virginia, or due to the closure of the TANF case prior to the completion of 24 months of TANF assistance, excluding cases closed with a sanction for noncompliance with the Virginia Initiative for Employment Not Welfare program, shall be eligible to receive employment and training assistance for up to 12 months after termination, if needed, in addition to other transitional services provided pursuant to §

63.2-611

, Code of Virginia.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 568 deleted the former last sentence in subsection A, which read: “The Department shall include in its annual report to the Governor and General Assembly an evaluation of program effectiveness statewide and by locality, including an evaluation of case management services”; substituted “required to enable” for “essential to” in subdivision B 1 a; and in subsection C, substituted “according to policies of the Virginia Department of Medical Assistance Services; and” for “unless (i) medical insurance is available through the parent’s employer or (ii) family income exceeds 185 percent of the federal poverty level” in subdivision C 3, added subdivision C 4 and made a related change.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by c. 166 and 218 are identical, and rewrote subdivision C 1, which read: “Assistance with child care if such assistance enables the individual to work”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 63.2-612.
Time limit on the receipt of TANF.

Unless otherwise exempt, VIEW participants and their families may receive TANF financial assistance for a maximum of 24 months only, subject to §

63.2-613

. VIEW participants and their families may receive TANF financial assistance, if otherwise eligible, after a subsequent period of 24 months. However, the 24-month period of ineligibility shall not apply when a child is removed from the parents’ home as the result of a child protective services report or complaint as defined in regulations promulgated by the Board and is placed with a relative. In such cases, the relative with whom the child is placed shall be eligible to receive TANF financial assistance immediately and without waiting for the 24-month period of ineligibility to run.

The local department shall notify a VIEW participant and his family that his TANF financial assistance is scheduled to be terminated as provided in this section. Notice shall be given 60 days prior to such termination and shall inform the VIEW participant and his family of the exception regulations adopted by the Board and the procedure to be followed by the VIEW participant and his family if he believes that he is entitled to an extension of benefits.

History.

1994, cc. 858, 951, § 63.1-133.50; 1995, c. 450; 2002, c. 747; 2007, c. 568; 2008, cc. 132, 564.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 350 F, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “A participant whose Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) financial assistance is terminated due to the receipt of 24 months of assistance as specified in §

63.2-612

, Code of Virginia, or due to the closure of the TANF case prior to the completion of 24 months of TANF assistance, excluding cases closed with a sanction for noncompliance with the Virginia Initiative for Employment Not Welfare program, shall be eligible to receive employment and training assistance for up to 12 months after termination, if needed, in addition to other transitional services provided pursuant to §

63.2-611

, Code of Virginia.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 568 deleted “without (i) participation in VIEW, (ii) the receipt of TANF financial assistance, or (iii) the receipt of transitional assistance” at the end of the first paragraph.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 132 and 564 are identical, and added the last two sentences in the first paragraph and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 63.2-613.
Hardship exceptions.

The Board shall adopt regulations providing exceptions to the time limitations of this chapter in cases of hardship. In adopting regulations, the Board shall address circumstances:

Where a VIEW participant has been actively seeking employment by engaging in job-seeking activities required pursuant to §

60.2-612

and is unable to find employment;

Where factors relating to job availability may be unfavorable;

Where the VIEW participant loses his job as a result of factors not related to his job performance; and

Where extension of benefits for up to one year will enable a participant to complete employment-related education or training.The Department shall (i) keep records of the number of VIEW participants who receive an exception to the time limitations on TANF benefits due to hardship and the specific circumstances relied upon to grant such exceptions and (ii) annually publish nonidentifying statistics regarding such information.

History.

1994, cc. 858, 951, § 63.1-133.51; 1995, c. 450; 2002, c. 747; 2020, c. 7.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 7 added the last paragraph.

§ 63.2-614.
Financial eligibility.

Pursuant to regulations adopted by the Board, the parent of an eligible child or children who is married to a person not the parent of the child or children shall not be eligible for TANF if the parent’s spouse’s income, when deemed available to the family unit according to federal regulations, in and of itself, exceeds the state eligibility standard for such aid. However, eligibility for the child or children shall be considered by counting the income of such parent and child or children, and any portion of the parent’s spouse’s income that exceeds 150 percent of the federal poverty level for the spouse and parent. If the income of the parent’s spouse that is deemed available does not, in and of itself, exceed the state eligibility standard for TANF, none of the spouse’s income shall be counted as available to the family unit, and eligibility shall be determined considering only the income, if any, of the parent and the child or children. If the parent fails or refuses to cooperate with the Department’s Division of Child Support Enforcement in the pursuit of child support, the income of the parent’s current spouse shall be counted in accordance with Title IV-A federal regulations at 45 C.F.R. 233.20(a) (3) (xiv) in determining eligibility for TANF for the parent’s child or children.

Program participants shall be eligible for the income disregards and resource exclusions in §

63.2-505

.

VIEW participants and their families shall also be eligible for the following income disregards and resource exclusions:

To reward work, a VIEW participant and his family who have earned income from any source other than VIEW, may continue to receive TANF financial assistance for up to two years from the date that both parties initially sign the agreement. However, in no event shall the TANF payment when added to the earned income exceed such percentage of the federal poverty level established by the Commissioner, and if necessary any TANF payment shall be reduced so that earned income plus the TANF payment equals such percentage of the federal poverty level established by the Commissioner.

The fair market value, not to exceed $7,500, of one operable motor vehicle per family.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-141; 1954, c. 495; 1966, c. 665; 1968, cc. 578, 667, 668, 781, § 63.1-105; 1970, c. 721; 1974, c. 418; 1982, c. 386; 1993, c. 167; 1994, cc. 188, 858, 951, § 63.1-133.47; 1995, c. 450; 1996, c. 857; 1999, c. 638; 2001, c. 483; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-615.
Payment of tuition and other expenses of public assistance recipients enrolled in skill development training programs.

The Board may authorize the payment of tuition fees, transportation costs or other necessary or incidental expenses for obtaining skill development training or retraining for qualified public assistance recipients. The Board may, by regulation, prescribe necessary requisites and conditions under which such payments may be made. Such assistance shall be in addition to any other public assistance for which such recipient may be eligible and shall not affect his entitlement thereto.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-110.1; 1968, c. 586, § 63.1-96.1; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-616.
Provision of public assistance and social services.

Local departments may combine community resources to assist the families of persons who may be in need because of the limitations on TANF financial assistance and may arrange for appropriate care of needy families where the limitation on TANF financial assistance as a result of the birth of an additional child or the two-year limit on TANF financial assistance is executed. Public assistance and social services may be provided that include, but are not limited to, help for families in obtaining donated food and clothing, continuation of food stamps for adults and children who are otherwise eligible, child care, and Medicaid coverage for adults and children who are otherwise eligible for Medicaid.

History.

1994, cc. 858, 951, § 63.1-133.52; 1995, c. 450; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-617.
Diversionary cash assistance.

The Board shall adopt regulations to enable TANF-eligible applicants meeting certain criteria to receive at one time the maximum TANF cash assistance that the applicant would otherwise receive for a period up to 120 days or $1,500, whichever is greater. An individual may receive diversionary TANF cash assistance only one time in a 12-month period and, in so doing, waives his eligibility for TANF for the number of days for which assistance is granted multiplied by 1.33. Diversionary assistance shall be used to divert the family from receiving ongoing TANF cash assistance by providing assistance for one-time emergencies.

The Board shall adopt regulations to enable TANF-eligible applicants meeting certain criteria to receive a TANF emergency assistance payment of up to $1,500 to prevent eviction or to address needs resulting from a fire or natural disaster.

History.

1995, c. 450, § 63.1-105.3; 2002, c. 747; 2009, cc. 61, 547; 2020, c. 1159.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, cc. 61 and 547, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall report to the chairmen of the Senate Finance and House Appropriations committees no later than October 1, 2012, on the savings achieved through use of diversionary assistance in Fiscal Year 2010 through Fiscal Year 2012.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 61 and 547 are identical, and substituted “12-month period” for “sixty-month period” in the next-to-last sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1159, in subsection A in the first sentence, added “or $1,500, whichever is greater” at the end; and in the second sentence, substituted “the number of days for which assistance is granted multiplied by 1.33” for “a period of up to 160 days” and added subsection B.

§ 63.2-618.
Notice and appeal.

A participant aggrieved by the decision of a local board granting, denying, changing or discontinuing public assistance may appeal such decision pursuant to §

63.2-517

. If a hearing request is received prior to the effective date of any proposed change in benefit status, a participant appealing such change shall have the right to continued direct payment of TANF benefits pending final administrative action on such appeal.

History.

1994, cc. 858, 951, § 63.1-133.53; 1995, c. 450; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-619.
Repealed by Acts 2016, c. 23, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

63.2-619

, pertaining to evaluation methods and reporting for the program, derived from 1994, cc. 858, 951, § 63.1-133.54; 1995, c. 450; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-620.
Child care services for TANF and low-income families.

The Department shall identify strategies for Virginia to obtain the maximum amount of federal funds available for child care services for TANF recipients and families whose incomes are at or below 185 percent of the federal poverty level. The Department shall provide an annual report on these strategies to the chairmen of the House Committees on Appropriations and on Health, Welfare and Institutions and the Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations and on Rehabilitation and Social Services by December 15.

History.

2001, c. 184, § 63.1-105.9; 2002, c. 747.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “Senate Committees on Finance and Appropriations” for “Senate Committees on Finance” and in the second sentence, inserted “on” preceding “Health” and preceding “Rehabilitation” and inserted “the” preceding “Senate.” March 10, 2021.

§ 63.2-621.
Restrictions on use of TANF cash assistance.

Recipients of TANF benefits pursuant to this chapter shall not access TANF cash benefits through an electronic benefit transaction (i) for the purchase of alcoholic beverages, tobacco products, lottery tickets, or sexually explicit visual materials as defined in §

18.2-374.1

; (ii) in any transaction in any (a) government store established for the sale of alcoholic beverages, (b) establishment in which pari-mutuel wagering or charitable gaming is conducted, or (c) establishment in which tattooing or body-piercing, as defined in §

54.1-700

, is performed for hire or consideration; or (iii) in any establishment that provides adult-oriented entertainment in which performers or other individuals connected with the business appear nude or partially nude.

History.

2013, cc. 160, 733.